Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1715
Membership officer, defined.

Membership officer shall mean any member appointed by the board of directors of a credit union whose primary function is to act on applications for membership under the conditions the board and bylaws have prescribed.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 15.